North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 12. Joint Deposits. [Repealed]

§§ 53-146,
53-146.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-146; 1917, c. 243, s. 1; C.S., s. 230; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-146.1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1078, s. 1; 1989, c. 164, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 866, s. 4; 1998-69, s. 13; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-146.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-236, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1078, s. 1; 1989, c. 164, s. 5; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 866, s. 5; 1998-69, s. 14; 2001-267, s. 1; repealed by 2011-236, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011.

§§ 53-146.2A through 53-146.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-146.2A; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1078, s. 1; 1989, c. 164, s. 5; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 866, s. 5; 1998-69, s. 14; 2001-267, s. 1; 2011-236, s. 1; 2012-168, s. 4; 2012-194, s. 63; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-146.3; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1078, s. 1; 1989, c. 164, s. 8; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 866, s. 6; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-147.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1943, c. 543.